Wisconsin, session 2025, AB7.
do enact as follows:AB7,11Section 1. 66.0401 (1m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB7,2,9266.0401 (1m) Authority to restrict systems limited. (intro.) No Except 3as provided in sub. (1r), no political subdivision may place any restriction, either 4directly or in effect, on the installation or use of a wind energy system that is more 5restrictive than the rules promulgated by the commission under s. 196.378 (4g) (b). 6No Except as provided in sub. (1r), no political subdivision may place any 7restriction, either directly or in effect, on the installation or use of a solar energy 8system, as defined in s. 13.48 (2) (h) 1. g., or a wind energy system, unless the 9restriction satisfies one of the following conditions:AB7,210Section 2. 66.0401 (1r) of the statutes is created to read:AB7,2,121166.0401 (1r) Authority to approve or reject certain wind or solar 12projects. (a) In this subsection:AB7,2,13131. “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.AB7,3,412. “Solar project” means an area of land on which solar photovoltaic panels or 2other devices used for collecting solar energy and any associated equipment and 3facilities are installed in order to generate electricity and which altogether is 4designed for nominal operation at a capacity of 15 megawatts or more.AB7,3,853. “Wind project” means an area of land on which devices used for collecting 6wind energy and any associated equipment and facilities are installed in order to 7generate electricity and which altogether is designed for nominal operation at a 8capacity of 15 megawatts or more.AB7,3,139(b) Before the commission may approve a certificate of authority under s. 10196.49 or a certificate of public convenience and necessity under s. 196.491 (3) to 11construct a solar project or wind project, the person seeking the certificate shall 12seek approval from each municipality in which the solar project or wind project is to 13be located.AB7,3,1914(c) Notwithstanding sub. (4), a municipality shall, except as provided under 15par. (d), approve or disapprove a proposed solar project or wind project by adopting 16a resolution to that effect no later than 90 days after the person seeking approval 17submits the request for such approval. If a municipality fails to act within the 90 18days, or within any extended time period established under par. (d), the solar 19project or wind project is considered approved.AB7,4,220(d) A municipality may extend the time period under par. (c) if, within that 90-21day period, the municipality authorizes the extension in writing. A municipality 22may authorize any combination of the following extensions, except that the total 1amount of time for all extensions it authorizes under this paragraph may not exceed 290 days:AB7,4,431. An extension of up to 45 days if the municipality needs additional 4information to determine whether to approve or deny the request for approval.AB7,4,652. An extension of up to 90 days if the requester makes a material 6modification to the request for approval.AB7,4,873. An extension of up to 90 days for other good cause specified in writing by 8the municipality.AB7,4,119(e) The limitations of authority under s. 66.0401 (1m) do not apply to requests 10for approval of a solar project or wind project by a municipality under this 11subsection.AB7,312Section 3. 66.0401 (4) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB7,4,141366.0401 (4) (h) This subsection does not apply to requests for approval of a 14wind project under sub. (1r).AB7,415Section 4. 196.49 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB7,4,2016196.49 (4m) The commission may not issue a certificate under sub. (1), (2), or 17(3) for the construction of a solar project, as defined in s. 66.0401 (1r) (a) 2., or a 18wind project, as defined in s. 66.0401 (1r) (a) 3., unless each city, village, and town 19in which the project is proposed to be located has adopted a resolution approving 20the project under s. 66.0401.AB7,521Section 5. 196.491 (3) (d) 9. of the statutes is created to read:AB7,5,222196.491 (3) (d) 9. For a facility that is a solar project, as defined in s. 66.0401 23(1r) (a) 2., or a wind project, as defined in s. 66.0401 (1r) (a) 3., each city, village, and 1town in which the project is proposed to be located has adopted a resolution 2approving the project under s. 66.0401.AB7,5,33